dev/verbs/VERBS-scraps.lexc
Multichar_Symbols


! Part of speech categories
%<n%>          ! Noun                       
%<np%>         ! Proper noun                
%<adj%>        ! Adjective                  
%<num%>        ! Numeral                    
%<prn%>        ! Pronoun                    
%<det%>        ! Determiner                 
%<v%>          ! Verb                       
%<vaux%>       ! Auxilary verb              
%<adv%>        ! Adverb                     
%<post%>       ! Postposition               
%<postadv%>    ! Postadverb                 
%<cnjcoo%>     ! Co-ordinating conjunction  
%<cnjsub%>     ! Sub-ordinating conjunction 
%<cnjadv%>     ! Adverbial conjunction      
%<part%>       ! Particle                   
%<ij%>         ! Interjection               
%<abbr%>       ! Abbreviation               
%<cop%>        ! Copula                     
%<qst%>        ! Question particle
!%<ideo%>       ! Ideophone                  

! Proper noun types
%<top%>            
%<ant%>            
%<cog%>            
%<org%>            
%<al%>             

!! gender of anthroponyms 
%<m%>              ! Masculine    
%<f%>              ! Feminine     

! "Syntactic" tags. Attributive use of non-adjectives etc. !!!!! NOT SURE I WANT THIS !!!!
%<attr%>           ! Attributive
%<subst%>          ! Substantive
%<advl%>           ! Adverbial

! Number ! Сан ! Число
%<sg%>             ! Singular  
%<pl%>             ! Plural    
%<sp%>             ! Singular/Plural (used for formal personal pronoun)

! Possessives 
%<px1sg%>          ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>          ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>          ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>          ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>          ! Second person singular
%<px%>             ! General possessive           ! NOT SURE I WANT THIS

! Cases ! "Case is a lie!" (quot.)

%<nom%>            
%<gen%>            
%<dat%>            
%<acc%>            
%<abl%>            
%<loc%>            
%<ins%>            ! Instrumental=comitative 


! Pronoun types ! Алмашлык төрләре ! Виды местоимений
%<pers%>           ! Personal
! Pronoun and determiner types
%<dem%>            ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>            ! Indefinite
%<itg%>            ! Interrogative
%<qnt%>            ! Quantifier
%<neg%>            ! Negative    ! NOTE: also used to denote negation in verbs ! what do you mean firespeake
r??
%<ref%>            ! Reflexive

!! Numeral types
%<ord%>            ! Ordinal
%<coll%>           ! Collective
%<dist%>           ! Distibutive

! Tense, aspect, mood
%<imp%>            ! Imperative
%<cond%>           ! Conditional  ! Шарт  ! Условное  !! -с{A}
%<caus%>           ! Causative
%<pass%>           ! Passive
%<coop%>           ! Cooperative

%<pres%>           ! -{A}
%<past%>           ! -{D}{I} 
%<evi%>            ! -m{I}s 
%<fut%>		   ! -{A}C{A}{K}  
%<aorcond%>	   ! conditional aorist arsa/rsa/irse


%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>

%<sg%>
%<pl%>

%<necs%>                     ! Necessitive

%<ger1%>                     ! Gerund (verbal noun) 
%<ger2%>
%<ger3%>
%<ger4%>

%<gna1%>                     ! Verbal adverb
%<gna2%>                     ! Verbal adverb

%<gpr1%>                     ! Verbal adjective

%<prc1%>                     ! Participle

%{I%}
%{A%}

%{L%}
%{D%}

%{a%}

%{n%}		   ! Becomes "n" after a vowel, otherwise null
%{y%}		   ! Becomes "y" after a vowel, otherwise null
%{s%}		   ! Becomes "s" after a vowel, otherwise null
%{i%}		   ! Becomes as "i" after a consonant, otherwise null
%{pN%}		   ! Becomes "n" before dat abl loc and after 3p poss, otherwise null
%{t%}
%{ç%}
%{e%}

%{f%}              ! Enforce front harmony
%{b%}              ! Enforce back harmony


% 
%+
%-


LEXICON Root

Verbs ; 
Nouns ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     NOMINAL INFLECTION (N-INFL-COMMON)!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC ;
!ABE-ETC ;

LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;               
%<gen%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}n CLIT ;      
%<dat%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} CLIT ;   
%<acc%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;  

!!!! POSSESSIVES

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC 

CASE ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
  
LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}m CASE-ETC ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}n CASE-ETC ;                 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{pN%} CASE-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;      
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{pN%} CASE-ETC ;  


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Noun paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N1 ! Generic noun paradigm.
           ! e.g. ev, kitap, ...

%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON N2 ! Compound nouns with compulsory possession. 
           ! e.g. dikiş makinası, dikiş makinaları, ...

%<n%>: POSS-REAL ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r POSS-REAL ; 

LEXICON N3 ! Nationalities which can form language, etc.
           ! e.g. turk, turkçe

%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON N4 ! Nouns with usage as postpositions. 
           ! We separate these in case they have some different morphotactics.
           ! e.g. arka: arkasına, iç: içinde

%<n%>: SUBST ; 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON COPULA

%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;                
!%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r # ;                                
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}rl%{A%}r # ;    

%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}m # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}m # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%} # ;
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}k # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}l%{A%}r # ;  

%+i%<cop%>%<ken%>:%>%{y%}ken # ;    

LEXICON DEGIL

%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>değilim # ;     
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>değisin # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>değil # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>değiliz # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>değilsiniz # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>değiller # ;   

%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>değildim # ;     
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>değidin # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>değildi # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>değildik # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>değildiniz # ;                
%+i%<cop%>%<neg%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>değildiler # ;   

LEXICON DEGIL-QUESTION

%<cop%>%<neg%>:%>% değil QST ;

LEXICON COP

COPULA ;
DEGIL ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLIT

%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL ; 
# ;  !! This is the end of word marker.

!LEXICON V-PERS-COP

!%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL ;
!%+i%<cop%>%<rel%>:%>ken # ;

LEXICON CLIT-GENERAL    ! Includes personal copula suffixes, therefore appears only
                        ! after nominal parts of speech (and only after some cases).
                        ! FIXME: to be checked whether leads to any overgeneration
CLIT ;
!V-PERS-COP ;
COP ;

LEXICON Nouns
açkı:açkı N1 ; ! "key"
afetzede:afetzede N1 ; ! "victim"
ahiret:ahiret N1 ; ! "eternity"
akıntı:akıntı N1 ; ! "current"
akuzatif:akuzatif N1 ; ! "accusative"
alnaç:alnaç N1 ; ! "front"
anahat:anahat N1 ; ! "outline"
araba:araba N1 ; ! "car"
aspirin:aspirin N1 ; ! "aspirin"
avrat:avrat N1 ; ! "wife"
baca:baca N1 ; ! "chimney"
bakanlık:bakanlık N1 ; ! "ministry"
banker:banker N1 ; ! "broker"
basketbol:basketbol N1 ; ! "basketball"
beğeni:beğeni N1 ; ! "like"
beybaba:beybaba N1 ; ! "grandfather"
bilet:bilet N1 ; ! "ticket"
bisturi:bisturi N1 ; ! "bisturi"
boğmaca:boğmaca N1 ; ! "whooping cough"
bora:bora N1 ; ! "hurricane"
bozkır:bozkır N1 ; ! "desert"
büküm:büküm N1 ; ! "inflection"
buton:buton N1 ; ! "button"
çağıltı:çağıltı N1 ; ! "gurgle"
cambazhane:cambazhane N1 ; ! "circus"
çarpım:çarpım N1 ; ! "multiplication"
çekiliş:çekiliş N1 ; ! "raffle"
çıktı:çıktı N1 ; ! "output"
çivi:çivi N1 ; ! "nail"
dahil:dahil N1 ; ! "interior"
danışman:danışman N1 ; ! "adviser"
dede:dede N1 ; ! "grandfather"
delege:delege N1 ; ! "representative"
derbent:derbent N1 ; ! "guard"
devinim:devinim N1 ; ! "action"
dip:dip N1 ; ! "bottom"
dokunulmazlık:dokunulmazlık N1 ; ! "immunity"
dragon:dragon N1 ; ! "dragon"
duygu:duygu N1 ; ! "emotion"
edim:edim N1 ; ! "act"
elalem:elalem N1 ; ! "people"
emir:emir N1 ; ! "order"
epidemi:epidemi N1 ; ! "epidemic"
eşkal:eşkal N1 ; ! "description"
evre:evre N1 ; ! "step"
favori:favori N1 ; ! "favorite"
fiiliyat:fiiliyat N1 ; ! "deed"
fıskiye:fıskiye N1 ; ! "fountain"
frengi:frengi N1 ; ! "pox"
garez:garez N1 ; ! "animosity"
geçek:geçek N1 ; ! "passage"
genişlik:genişlik N1 ; ! "width"
gıda:gıda N1 ; ! "food"
göç:göç N1 ; ! "migration"
gönen:gönen N1 ; ! "moist"
gözcü:gözcü N1 ; ! "watchman"
güç:güç N1 ; ! "difficulty"
günah:günah N1 ; ! "sin"
güvenirlik:güvenirlik N1 ; ! "solidity"
hafıza:hafıza N1 ; ! "memory"
halet:halet N1 ; ! "situation"
hamule:hamule N1 ; ! "charge"
harcırah:harcırah N1 ; ! "expenditure"
hasenat:hasenat N1 ; ! "good"
hata:hata N1 ; ! "mistake"
hayal:hayal N1 ; ! "dream"
hayta:hayta N1 ; ! "hooligan"
hemşire:hemşire N1 ; ! "sister"
hıçkırık:hıçkırık N1 ; ! "hiccup"
hipodrom:hipodrom N1 ; ! "racetrack"
hissiyat:hissiyat N1 ; ! "soul"
holding:holding N1 ; ! "holding"
hükümet:hükümet N1 ; ! "government"
huy:huy N1 ; ! "temper"
idame:idame N1 ; ! "maintenance"
ihbar:ihbar N1 ; ! "notice"
ikamet:ikamet N1 ; ! "residence"
ilhak:ilhak N1 ; ! "annex"
ilzam:ilzam N1 ; ! "binding"
imtihan:imtihan N1 ; ! "examen"
inkisar:inkisar N1 ; ! "displeasure"
ip:ip N1 ; ! "rope"
irtibat:irtibat N1 ; ! "connection"
ışıltı:ışıltı N1 ; ! "blaze"
işkence:işkence N1 ; ! "torture"
iştah:iştah N1 ; ! "appetite"
istintaç:istintaç N1 ; ! "consequent"
ivaz:ivaz N1 ; ! "consideration"
izzetüikram:izzetüikram N1 ; ! "entertainment"
kaban:kaban N1 ; ! "coat"
kaçık:kaçık N1 ; ! "crazy"
kahvehane:kahvehane N1 ; ! "cafe"
kamara:kamara N1 ; ! "chamber"
kanser:kanser N1 ; ! "cancer"
kapsam:kapsam N1 ; ! "range"
karasu:karasu N1 ; ! "glaucoma"
karnabit:karnabit N1 ; ! "cauliflower"
kasket:kasket N1 ; ! "cap"
kavkı:kavkı N1 ; ! "shell"
kayyım:kayyım N1 ; ! "guardian"
kelle:kelle N1 ; ! "head"
kesim:kesim N1 ; ! "slaughter"
kıllık:kıllık N1 ; ! "appearance"
kırım:kırım N1 ; ! "massacre"
kitabevi:kitabevi N1 ; ! "bookstore"
klips:klips N1 ; ! "clipping"
komser:komser N1 ; ! "commissar"
koridor:koridor N1 ; ! "corridor"
kravat:kravat N1 ; ! "tie"
kulvar:kulvar N1 ; ! "track"
kurusıkı:kurusıkı N1 ; ! "blank"
lavabo:lavabo N1 ; ! "basin"
maarif:maarif N1 ; ! "education"
mahrut:mahrut N1 ; ! "cone"
mango:mango N1 ; ! "mango"
materyal:materyal N1 ; ! "material"
melfuf:melfuf N1 ; ! "enclosed"
mesele:mesele N1 ; ! "matter"
meze:meze N1 ; ! "starter"
misafirperver:misafirperver N1 ; ! "hospitable"
muallim:muallim N1 ; ! "master"
muhassala:muhassala N1 ; ! "conclusion"
murat:murat N1 ; ! "intention"
mutluluk:mutluluk N1 ; ! "happiness"
naylon:naylon N1 ; ! "nylon"
nitrat:nitrat N1 ; ! "nitrat"
nü:nü N1 ; ! "nude"
sigara:sigara N1 ; ! "cigarette"
